Louisiana, session 2026, SB386.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 20-B of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:1780.1 through 1780.5, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 20-B. LOUISIANA DATA PRIVACY ACT
§1780.1. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Affiliate" means a legal entity that controls, is controlled by, or is
under common control with another legal entity or shares common branding
with another legal entity. For purposes of this Paragraph, "control" or
"controlled" means any of the following:
(a) The ownership of, or power to vote, more than fifty percent of the
outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a company.
(b) The control in any manner over the election of a majority of the
directors or of individuals exercising similar functions.
(c) The power to exercise controlling influence over the management of
a company.
(2) "Authenticate" means to verify through reasonable means that the
Page 1 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
consumer who is entitled to exercise the consumer's rights pursuant to R.S.
51:1780.3 is the same consumer exercising those consumer rights with respect
to the personal data at issue.
(3) "Biometric data" means data generated by automatic measurements
of an individual's biological characteristics that are used to identify a specific
individual. The term includes a fingerprint, voiceprint, eye retina or iris scan,
or other unique biological pattern or characteristic when such data is used to
identify the specific individual. The term does not include a physical or digital
photograph or data generated from a physical or digital photograph or a video
or audio recording or data generated from a video or audio recording, unless
such data is generated to identify a specific individual. The term does not
include information collected, used, or stored for health care treatment,
payment, or operations under the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 1320d et seq.
(4) "Business associate" has the same meaning assigned to the term by
the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 45 CFR Part
160.103.
(5) "Child" means an individual younger than thirteen years of age.
(6) "Consent" when referring to a consumer means a clear affirmative
act signifying a consumer's freely given, specific, informed, and unambiguous
agreement to process personal data relating to the consumer. The term includes
a written statement, including a statement written by electronic means, or any
other unambiguous affirmative action. The term does not include any of the
following:
(a) Acceptance in a general or broad terms of use or similar document
that contains descriptions of personal data processing along with other,
unrelated information.
(b) Hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of content.
(c) Agreement obtained through the use of dark patterns.
(7) "Consumer" means an individual who is a resident of this state acting
Page 2 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
only in an individual or household context. The term does not include an
individual acting in a commercial or employment context.
(8) "Controller" means an individual or other person that, alone or
jointly with others, determines the purpose and means of processing personal
data.
(9) "Covered entity" has the meaning assigned to the term by the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 1320d et seq.
(10) "Dark pattern" means a user interface designed or manipulated
with the effect of substantially subverting or impairing user autonomy,
decision-making, or choice, and includes any practice the Federal Trade
Commission refers to as a dark pattern.
(11) "Decision that produces a legal or similarly significant effect
concerning a consumer" means a decision made by the controller that results
in the provision or denial by the controller of any of the following:
(a) Financial and lending services.
(b) Housing, insurance, or healthcare services.
(c) Education enrollment.
(d) Employment opportunities.
(e) Criminal justice.
(f) Access to basic necessities, such as food and water.
(12) "Deidentified data" means data that cannot reasonably be used to
infer information about, or otherwise be linked to an identified or identifiable
individual, or a device linked to that individual, if the controller or processor
that possesses such data does all of the following:
(a) Takes reasonable measures to ensure that such data cannot be
associated with an individual.
(b) Publicly commits to process such data only in a deidentified fashion
and attempt to reidentify such data.
(c) Contractually obligates any recipients of such data to satisfy the
criteria set forth in Subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this Paragraph.
Page 3 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
(13) "Healthcare provider" has the meaning assigned to the term by the
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 1320d
et seq.
(14) "Health record" means any written, printed, or electronically
recorded material maintained by a healthcare provider in the course of
providing healthcare services to an individual that concerns the individual and
the services provided. The term includes either one of the following items:
(a) The substance of any communication made by an individual to a
healthcare provider in confidence during or in connection with the provision of
healthcare services.
(b) Information otherwise acquired by the healthcare provider about an
individual in confidence and in connection with healthcare services provided to
the individual.
(15) "Identified or identifiable individual" means a consumer who can
be readily identified, directly or indirectly.
(16) "Institution of higher education" means either one of the following
items:
(a) An institution of higher education as defined by law.
(b) A private or independent institution of higher education as defined
by law.
(17) "Known child" means a child under circumstances where a
controller has actual knowledge of, or willfully disregards, the child's age.
(18) "Nonprofit organization" means any of the following:
(a) A corporation organized under the provisions of Chapter 2 of Title
12 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, to the extent applicable to
nonprofit corporations.
(b) An organization exempt from federal taxation under Section 501(a)
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended by being listed as an exempt
organization under Sections 501(c)(3), 501(c)(6), 501(c)(12), or 501(c)(19) of that
Code.
Page 4 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
(c) A political organization.
(d) An organization that is exempt from federal taxation under Section
501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended by being listed as an
exempt organization under Section 501(c)(4) of that Code.
(19) "Personal data" means any information, including sensitive data,
that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable individual.
The term does not include deidentified data or publicly available information.
(20) "Political organization" means a party, committee, association,
fund, or other organization, regardless of whether incorporated, that is
organized and operated primarily for the purpose of influencing or attempting
to influence either of the following:
(a) The selection, nomination, election, or appointment of an individual
to a federal, state, or local public office or an office in a political organization,
regardless of whether the individual is selected, nominated, elected, or
appointed.
(b) The election of a presidential/vice-presidential elector, regardless of
whether the elector is selected, nominated, elected, or appointed.
(c) The outcome of any ballot measure, referendum, initiative, or recall
election at the federal, state, or local level.
(d) Any political, legislative, or public policy matter, including public
opinion relating thereto.
(21) "Precise geolocation data" means information derived from
technology, including global positioning system level latitude and longitude
coordinates or other mechanisms, that directly identifies the specific location of
an individual with precision and accuracy within a radius of one thousand seven
hundred fifty feet. The term does not include the content of communications, or
any data generated by or connected to an advanced utility metering
infrastructure system or to equipment for use by a utility.
(22) "Process" or "processing" means an operation or set of operations
performed, whether by manual or automated means, on personal data or on sets
Page 5 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
of personal data, such as the collection, use, storage, disclosure, analysis,
deletion, or modification of personal data.
(23) "Processor" means a person that processes personal data on behalf
of a controller.
(24) "Profiling" means any form of solely automated processing
performed on personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects
related to an identified or identifiable individual's economic situation, health,
personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements.
(25) "Protected health information" has the meaning assigned to the
term by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42
U.S.C. 1320d et seq.
(26) "Pseudonymous data" means any information that cannot be
attributed to a specific individual without the use of additional information,
provided that the additional information is kept separately and is subject to
appropriate technical and organizational measures to ensure that the personal
data is not attributed to an identified or identifiable individual.
(27) "Publicly available information" means information that is lawfully
made available through government records, or information that a business has
a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public
through widely distributed media, by a consumer, or by a person to whom a
consumer has disclosed the information, unless the consumer has restricted the
information to a specific audience.
(28) "Sale of personal data" means the exchange of personal data for
monetary or other valuable consideration by the controller to a third party. The
term does not include any of the following:
(a) The disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the
personal data on the controller's behalf.
(b) The disclosure of personal data to a third party for purposes of
providing a product or service requested by the consumer.
(c) The disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of the
Page 6 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
controller.
(d) The disclosure of information that the consumer intentionally made
available to the general public through a mass media channel and did not
restrict to a specific audience.
(e) The disclosure of personal data directed by a consumer or made when
the consumer uses the controller to interact with a third party.
(f) The disclosure or transfer of personal data to a third party as an asset
that is part of a merger, acquisition, or similar activity, or a proposed merger,
acquisition, or similar activity.
(29) "Sensitive data" means a category of personal data. The term
includes any of the following:
(a) Personal data revealing racial or ethnic origin, religious beliefs,
mental or physical health diagnosis, sexuality, or citizenship or immigration
status.
(b) Genetic or biometric data that is processed for the purpose of
uniquely identifying an individual.
(c) Personal data collected from a known child.
(d) Precise geolocation data.
(30) "State agency" means a department, commission, board, office,
council, authority, or other agency in any branch of state government that is
created by the constitution or a statute of this state, including a university
system or institution of higher education as defined by law.
(31) "Targeted advertising" means displaying to a consumer an
advertisement that is selected based on personal data obtained or inferred from
that consumer's activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites or online
applications to predict the consumer's preferences or interests. The term does
not include an advertisement that is:
(a) Based on activities within a controller's own websites or online
applications.
(b) Based on the context of a consumer's current search query, visit to
Page 7 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
a website, or online application.
(c) Directed to a consumer in response to the consumer's request for
information or feedback.
(d) The processing of personal data solely for measuring or reporting
advertising performance, reach, or frequency.
(32) "Third party" means a person, other than the consumer, the
controller, the processor, or an affiliate of the controller or processor.
(33) "Trade secret" means all forms and types of information, including
business, scientific, technical, economic, or engineering information, and any
formula, design, prototype, pattern, plan, compilation, program device,
program, code, device, method, technique, process, procedure, financial data,
or list of actual or potential customers or suppliers, whether tangible or
intangible and whether or how stored, compiled, or memorialized physically,
electronically, graphically, photographically, or in writing if:
(a) The owner of the trade secret has taken reasonable measures under
the circumstances to keep the information secret.
(b) The information derives independent economic value, actual or
potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily
ascertainable through proper means by, another person who can obtain
economic value from the disclosure or use of the information.
§1780.2. Applicability; preemption
A. The provisions of this Chapter shall apply only to a person or entity
that does business in the state and that satisfies one or more of the following
thresholds:
(1) Has annual gross revenues in excess of twenty-five million dollars.
(2) Annually buys, receives for the business's commercial purposes, sells,
or shares for commercial purposes the personal information of seventy-five
thousand or more consumers, households, or devices.
(3) Derives fifty percent or more of its annual revenues from selling
consumers' personal information.
Page 8 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
B. The provisions of this Chapter do not apply to any of the following
items:
(1) A state agency or a political subdivision of this state.
(2) A financial institution and its affiliates or data subject to Title V,
Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. 6801 et seq., and the rules and
implementing regulations promulgated thereunder.
(3) A covered entity or business associate governed by the privacy,
security, and breach notification rules issued by the United States Department
of Health and Human Services, 45 CFR Parts 160 and 164, established under
the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C.
1320d et seq.
(4) A nonprofit organization.
(5) An institution of higher education.
(6) An electric public utility as defined in R.S. 45:121.
(7) A person, association, partnership, or corporation registered with the
secretary of state as a conductor of public opinion polls pursuant to R.S. 14:325.
C. The following information is exempt from this Chapter:
(1) Protected health information under the Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 1320d et seq.
(2) Health records.
(3) Patient identifying information for purposes of 42 U.S.C. 290dd-2.
(4) Identifiable private information:
(a) For purposes of the federal policy for the protection of human
subjects under 45 CFR Part 46.
(b) Collected as part of human subjects research under the good clinical
practice guidelines issued by The International Council for Harmonisation of
Technical Requirements for Pharmaceuticals for Human Use, otherwise known
as ICH, or of the protection of human subjects under 21 CFR Parts 50 and 56.
(c) That is personal data used or shared in research conducted in
accordance with the requirements set forth in this Chapter or other research
Page 9 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
conducted in accordance with applicable law.
(5) Information and documents created for purposes of the Health Care
Quality Improvement Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. 11101 et seq.
(6) Patient safety work product for purposes of the Patient Safety and
Quality Improvement Act of 2005, 42 U.S.C. 299b-21 et seq.
(7) Information derived from any of the healthcare-related information
listed in this Section that is deidentified in accordance with the requirements for
deidentification under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 1320d et seq.
(8) Information originating from, and intermingled to be
indistinguishable with, or information treated in the same manner as,
information exempt under this Section that is maintained by a covered entity
or business associate as defined by the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 1320d et seq., or by a program or a
qualified service organization as defined by 42 U.S.C. 290dd-2.
(9) Information that is included in a limited data set as described by 45
CFR 164.514(e), to the extent that the information is used, disclosed, and
maintained in the manner specified by 45 CFR 164.514(e).
(10) Information collected or used only for public health activities and
purposes as authorized by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 1320d et seq.
(11) The collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication, or use
of any personal information bearing on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit
standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal
characteristics, or mode of living by a consumer reporting agency or furnisher
that provides information for use in a consumer report, and by a user of a
consumer report, but only to the extent that the activity is regulated by and
authorized under the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq.
(12) Personal data collected, processed, sold, or disclosed in compliance
with the Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. 2721 et seq.
Page 10 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
(13) Personal data regulated by the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. 1232g.
(14) Personal data collected, processed, sold, or disclosed in compliance
with the Farm Credit Act of 1971, 12 U.S.C. 2001 et seq.
(15) Data processed or maintained in the course of an individual
applying to, being employed by, or acting as an agent or independent contractor
of a controller, processor, or third party, to the extent that the data is collected
and used within the context of that role.
(16) Data processed or maintained as the emergency contact information
of an individual under this Chapter that is used for emergency contact
purposes.
(17) Data that is processed or maintained and is necessary to retain to
administer benefits for another individual that relates to an individual
described by R.S. 51:1780.1(15) and used for the purposes of administering
those benefits.
D. The provisions of this Chapter shall not apply to the processing of
personal data by a person in the course of a purely personal or household
activity.
E. A controller or processor that complies with the verifiable parental
consent requirements of the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998,
15 U.S.C. 6501 et seq., and its rules, regulations, and exemptions with respect
to data collected online is considered to be in compliance with any requirement
to obtain parental consent under this Chapter.
§1780.3. Consumer rights; requests; appeals
A.(1) A consumer is entitled to exercise the consumer rights authorized
by this Section at any time by submitting a request to a controller specifying the
consumer rights the consumer wishes to exercise. With respect to the processing
of personal data belonging to a known child, a parent or legal guardian of the
child may exercise the consumer rights on behalf of the child.
(2) A controller shall comply with an authenticated consumer request to
Page 11 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
exercise the right to do any of the following:
(a) Confirm whether a controller is processing the consumer's personal
data and to access the personal data.
(b) Correct inaccuracies in the consumer's personal data, taking into
account the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing of
the consumer's personal data.
(c) Delete personal data provided by or obtained about the consumer.
(d) If the data is available in a digital format, obtain a copy of the
consumer's personal data that the consumer previously provided to the
controller in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable
format that allows the consumer to transmit the data to another controller
without hindrance.
(e) Opt out of the processing of the personal data for purposes of:
(i) Targeted advertising.
(ii) The sale of personal data.
(iii) Profiling in furtherance of a decision that produces a legal or
similarly significant effect concerning the consumer.
(3) Nothing in this Section shall require the controller to reveal a trade
secret.
B.(1) Except as otherwise provided by this Chapter, a controller shall
comply with a request submitted by a consumer to exercise the consumer's
rights pursuant to Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section.
(2) A controller shall respond to the consumer request without undue
delay, which may not be later than the forty-fifth calendar day after the date of
receipt of the request. The controller may extend the response period once by
an additional forty-five days when reasonably necessary, taking into account the
complexity and number of the consumer's requests, so long as the controller
informs the consumer of the extension within the initial forty-five day response
period, together with the reason for the extension.
(3) If a controller declines to take action regarding the consumer's
Page 12 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
request, the controller shall inform the consumer without undue delay, which
may not be later than the forty-fifth calendar day after the date of receipt of the
request, of the justification for declining to take action and provide instructions
on how to appeal the decision in accordance with Subsection C of this Section.
(4) A controller shall provide information in response to a consumer
request free of charge, up to twice annually per consumer. If a request from a
consumer is manifestly unfounded, excessive, or repetitive, the controller may
charge the consumer a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of
complying with the request or may decline to act on the request. The controller
bears the burden of demonstrating for purposes of this Subsection that a
request is manifestly unfounded, excessive, or repetitive.
(5) If a controller is unable to authenticate the request using
commercially reasonable efforts, the controller is not required to comply with
a consumer request submitted pursuant to Subsection A of this Section and may
request that the consumer provide additional information reasonably necessary
to authenticate the consumer and the consumer's request.
(6) A controller that has obtained personal data about a consumer from
a source other than the consumer is considered in compliance with a consumer's
request to delete that personal data pursuant to Subparagraph (A)(2)(c) of this
Section by either of the following:
(a) Retaining a record of the deletion request and the minimum data
necessary for the purpose of ensuring the consumer's personal data remains
deleted from the business's records and not using the retained data for any
other purpose under this Chapter.
(b) Opting the consumer out of the processing of that personal data for
any purpose other than a purpose that is exempt under the provisions of this
Chapter.
C.(1) A controller shall establish a process for a consumer to appeal the
controller's refusal to take action on a request within a reasonable period of
time after the consumer's receipt of the decisions pursuant to Paragraph (B)(3)
Page 13 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
of this Section.
(2) The appeal process shall be conspicuously available and similar to the
process for initiating action to exercise consumer rights by submitting a request
pursuant to Subsection A of this Section.
(3) A controller shall inform the consumer in writing of any action taken
or not taken in response to an appeal under this Section not later than the
sixtieth calendar day after the date of receipt of the appeal, including a written
explanation of the reason or reasons for the decision.
(4) If the controller denies an appeal, the controller shall provide the
consumer with the online mechanism described by R.S. 51:1780.5(B)(2) through
which the consumer may contact the attorney general to submit a complaint.
D. Any provision of a contract or agreement that waives or limits in any
way a consumer right described in this Section is contrary to public policy and
is void and unenforceable.
E.(1) A controller shall establish two or more secure and reliable
methods to enable consumers to submit a request to exercise their consumer
rights under this Chapter. The methods shall take into account all of the
following:
(a) The ways in which consumers normally interact with the controller.
(b) The necessity for secure and reliable communications of those
requests.
(c) The ability of the controller to authenticate the identity of the
consumer making the request.
(2) A controller may not require a consumer to create a new account to
exercise the consumer's rights under this Chapter but may require a consumer
to use an existing account.
(3) Except as provided by R.S. 51:1780.1(28)(d), if the controller
maintains a website, the controller shall provide a mechanism on the website for
consumers to submit requests for information required to be disclosed under
this Chapter.
Page 14 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
(4) A controller that operates exclusively online and has a direct
relationship with a consumer from whom the controller collects personal
information is only required to provide an email address for the submission of
requests described by Subparagraph(1)(c) of this Subsection.
(5) A consumer may designate another person to serve as the consumer's
authorized agent and act on the consumer's behalf to opt out of the processing
of the consumer's personal data pursuant to Items (A)(2)(e)(i) and (ii) of this
Section. A consumer may designate an authorized agent using a technology,
including a link to a website, an internet browser setting or extension, or a
global setting on an electronic device, that allows the consumer to indicate the
consumer's intent to opt out of the processing for targeted advertising, for sale
of personal data, or both. A controller shall comply with an opt-out request
received from an authorized agent under this Subsection if the controller is able
to verify, with commercially reasonable effort, the identity of the consumer and
the authorized agent's authority to act on the consumer's behalf. A controller
is not required to comply with an opt-out request received from an authorized
agent under this Subsection if any one of the following applies:
(a) The authorized agent does not communicate the request to the
controller in a clear and unambiguous manner.
(b) The controller is not able to verify, with commercially reasonable
effort, that the consumer is a resident of this state.
(c) The controller does not possess the ability to process the request.
(d) The controller does not process similar or identical requests the
controller receives from consumers for the purpose of complying with similar
or identical laws or regulations of another state.
(6) The technology described by this Subsection:
(a) Shall not unfairly disadvantage another controller.
(b) May not make use of a default setting, but shall require the consumer
to make an affirmative, freely given, and unambiguous choice to indicate the
consumer's intent to opt out of any processing of a consumer's personal data.
Page 15 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
(c) Shall be consumer-friendly and easy to use by the average consumer.
§1780.4. Duties
A.(1) A controller:
(a) Shall limit the collection of personal data to what is adequate,
relevant, and reasonably necessary in relation to the purposes for which that
personal data is processed, as disclosed to the consumer.
(b) For purposes of protecting the confidentiality, integrity, and
accessibility of personal data, shall establish, implement, and maintain
reasonable administrative, technical, and physical data security practices that
are appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at issue.
(2) A controller shall not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided by this Chapter, process personal data
for a purpose that is neither reasonably necessary to nor compatible with the
disclosed purpose for which the personal data is processed, as disclosed to the
consumer, unless the controller obtains the consumer's consent.
(b) Process personal data in violation of state and federal laws that
prohibit unlawful discrimination against consumers.
(c) Discriminate against a consumer for exercising any of the consumer
rights contained in this Chapter, including by denying goods or services,
charging different prices or rates for goods or services, or providing a different
level of quality of goods or services to the consumer.
(d) Process the sensitive data of a consumer without obtaining the
consumer's consent, or, in the case of processing the sensitive data of a known
child, without processing that data in accordance with the rules, regulations,
and the exceptions of the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998, 15
U.S.C. 6501 et seq.
(3) This Subsection may not be construed to require a controller to
provide a product or service that requires the personal data of a consumer that
the controller does not collect or maintain or to prohibit a controller from
offering a different price, rate, level, quality, or selection of goods or services to
Page 16 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
a consumer, including offering goods or services for no fee, if the consumer has
exercised the consumer's right to opt out pursuant to R.S. 51:1780.3(A) or the
offer is related to a consumer's voluntary participation in a bona fide loyalty,
rewards, premium features, discounts, or club card program.
B.(1) A controller shall provide consumers with a reasonably accessible
and clear privacy notice that includes all of the following:
(a) The categories of personal data processed by the controller,
including, if applicable, any sensitive data processed by the controller.
(b) The purpose for processing personal data.
(c) A process on how consumers may exercise their consumer rights
pursuant to R.S. 51:1780.3, including the process by which a consumer may
appeal a controller's decision with regard to the consumer's request.
(d) If applicable, the categories of personal data that the controller sells
to third parties.
(e) If applicable, the categories of third parties with whom the controller
sells personal data.
(f) A description of the methods required pursuant to R.S. 51:1780.3(E)
through which consumers can submit requests to exercise their consumer rights
under this Chapter.
(2) If a controller engages in the sale of personal data that is sensitive, the
controller shall post the following notice in the same manner as the privacy
notice described in Subsection B of this Section:
"NOTICE: We may sell your sensitive personal data."
(3) If a controller engages in the sale of personal data that is biometric
data, the controller shall post the following notice in the same manner as the
privacy notice described in Subsection B of this Section:
"NOTICE: We may sell your biometric personal data."
C. If a controller sells personal data to third parties or processes
personal data for targeted advertising, the controller shall clearly and
conspicuously disclose that process and the manner in which a consumer may
Page 17 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
exercise the right to opt out of that process.
D.(1) A processor shall adhere to the instructions of a controller and
shall assist the controller in meeting or complying with the controller's duties
or requirements under this Chapter, including:
(a) Taking into account the nature of processing and the information
available to the processor, by using appropriate technical and organizational
measures, insofar as this is reasonably practicable, to fulfill the controller's
obligation to respond to consumer rights requests submitted pursuant to R.S.
51:1780.3(A).
(b) Taking into account the nature of processing and the information
available to the processor, by assisting the controller in meeting the controller's
obligations in relation to the security of processing personal data, and in
relation to the notification of a breach of security of the processor's system
pursuant to R.S. 51:3071 et seq.
(c) Providing necessary information to enable the controller to conduct
and document data protection assessments under Subsection E of this Section.
(2) A contract between a controller and a processor shall govern the
processor's data processing procedures with respect to processing performed
on behalf of the controller. The contract shall include all of the following:
(a) Clear instructions for processing data.
(b) The nature and purpose of processing.
(c) The type of data subject to processing.
(d) The duration of processing.
(e) The rights and obligations of both parties.
(f) A requirement that the processor shall do all of the following:
(i) Ensure that each person processing personal data is subject to a duty
of confidentiality with respect to the data.
(ii) At the controller's direction, delete or return all personal data to the
controller as requested after the provision of the service is completed, unless
retention of the personal data is required by law.
Page 18 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
(iii) Make available to the controller, on reasonable request, all
information in the processor's possession necessary to demonstrate the
processor's compliance with the requirements of this Chapter.
(iv) Allow, and cooperate with, reasonable assessments by the controller
or the controller's designated assessor.
(v) Engage any subcontractor pursuant to a written contract that
requires the subcontractor to meet the requirements of the processor with
respect to the personal data.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Chapter, a processor,
in the alternative, may arrange for a qualified and independent assessor to
conduct an assessment of the processor's policies and technical and
organizational measures in support of the requirements under this Chapter
using an appropriate and accepted control standard or framework and
assessment procedure. The processor shall provide a report of the assessment
to the controller on request.
(4) This Section shall not be construed to relieve a controller or a
processor from the liabilities imposed on the controller or processor by virtue
of its role in the processing relationship as described by this Chapter.
(5) A determination of whether a person is acting as a controller or
processor with respect to a specific processing of data is a fact-based
determination that depends on the context in which personal data is to be
processed. A processor that continues to adhere to a controller's instructions
with respect to a specific processing of personal data remains in the role of a
processor.
E.(1) A controller shall conduct and document a data protection
assessment of each of the following processing activities involving personal data:
(a) The processing of personal data for purposes of targeted advertising.
(b) The sale of personal data.
(c) The processing of personal data for purposes of profiling, if the
profiling presents a reasonably foreseeable risk of any of the following:
Page 19 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
(i) Unfair or deceptive treatment of or unlawful disparate impact on
consumers.
(ii) Financial, physical, or reputational injury to consumers.
(iii) A physical or other intrusion on the solitude or seclusion, or the
private affairs or concerns, of consumers, if the intrusion would be offensive to
a reasonable person.
(iv) Other substantial injury to consumers.
(d) The processing of sensitive data.
(e) Any processing activities involving personal data that present a
heightened risk of harm to consumers.
(2) A data protection assessment conducted pursuant to Paragraph (1)
of this Subsection shall do both of the following:
(a) Identify and weigh the direct or indirect benefits that may flow from
the processing to the controller, the consumer, other stakeholders, and the
public, against the potential risks to the rights of the consumer associated with
that processing, as mitigated by safeguards that can be employed by the
controller to reduce the risks.
(b) Factor into the assessment all of the following:
(i) The use of deidentified data.
(ii) The reasonable expectations of consumers.
(iii) The context of the processing.
(iv) The relationship between the controller and the consumer whose
personal data will be processed.
(3) A controller shall make a data protection assessment requested
pursuant to R.S. 51:1780.5(C)(2) available to the attorney general pursuant to
a civil investigative demand pursuant to R.S. 51:1780.5(C).
(4) A data protection assessment is confidential and exempt from public
inspection and copying pursuant to this Section. Disclosure of a data protection
assessment in compliance with a request from the attorney general does not
constitute a waiver of attorney-client privilege or work product protection with
Page 20 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
respect to the assessment and any information contained in the assessment.
(5) A single data protection assessment may address a comparable set of
processing operations that include similar activities.
(6) A data protection assessment conducted by a controller for the
purpose of compliance with other laws or regulations may constitute compliance
with the requirements of this Section if the assessment has a reasonably
comparable scope and effect.
(7) Data protection assessments are required for processing activities as
of January 1, 2027, and are not retroactive.
F.(1) A controller in possession of deidentified data shall do all of the
following:
(a) Take reasonable measures to ensure that the data cannot be
associated with an individual.
(b) Publicly commit to maintaining and using deidentified data without
attempting to reidentify the data.
(c) Contractually obligate any recipient of the deidentified data to
comply with the provisions of this Chapter.
(2) This Chapter shall not be construed to require a controller or
processor to do any of the following:
(a) Reidentify deidentified data or pseudonymous data.
(b) Maintain data in identifiable form or obtain, retain, or access any
data or technology for the purpose of allowing the controller or processor to
associate a consumer request with personal data.
(c) Comply with an authenticated consumer rights request under R.S.
51:1780.3(A), if the controller is all of the following:
(i) Is not reasonably capable of associating the request with the personal
data or it would be unreasonably burdensome for the controller to associate the
request with the personal data.
(ii) Does not use the personal data to recognize or respond to the specific
consumer who is the subject of the personal data or associate the personal data
Page 21 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
with other personal data about the same specific consumer.
(iii) Does not sell the personal data to any third party or otherwise
voluntarily disclose the personal data to any third party other than a processor,
except as otherwise permitted by this Section.
G. This Section shall not prevent a controller or processor's ability to
prevent, detect, protect against or respond to security incidents, identity theft,
fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive activity, or illegal activity; preserve
the integrity or security of systems; or investigate, report, or prosecute those
responsible for such actions.
H. This Chapter shall not be construed to limit a controller or
processor's ability to do any of the following:
(1) Comply with federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations.
(2) Comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, investigation,
subpoena, or summons by federal, state, local, or other governmental
authorities.
(3) Investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or defend legal claims.
(4) Provide a product or service specifically requested by a consumer or
the parent or guardian of a child, perform a contract to which the consumer is
a party, including fulfilling the terms of a written warranty, or taking steps at
the request of the consumer before entering into a contract.
(5) Take immediate steps to protect against an interest that is essential
for the life or physical safety of the consumer or of another individual and in
which the processing cannot be manifestly based on another legal basis.
(6) Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific or statistical research in
the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws
and is approved, monitored, and governed by an institutional review board or
similarly independent oversight entity that determines all of the following has
occurred:
(a) If the deletion of the information is likely to provide benefits that do
not exclusively accrue to the controller.
Page 22 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
(b) Whether the expected benefits of the research outweigh the privacy
risks.
(c) If the controller has implemented reasonable safeguards to mitigate
privacy risks associated with research, including any risks associated with
reidentification.
(7) Assist another controller, processor, or third party with any of the
requirements pursuant to this Subsection.
(8) Cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning conduct or
activity that the controller or processor reasonably and in good faith believes
may violate federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations.
I. The obligations imposed on controllers or processors pursuant to this
Chapter shall not restrict a controller's or processor's ability to collect, use, or
retain data for internal use to do any of the following:
(1) Conduct internal research to develop, improve, or repair products,
service, or technology.
(2) Effectuate a product recall.
(3) Identify and repair technical errors that impair existing or intended
functionality.
(4) Perform internal operations that are reasonably aligned with the
expectations of the consumer or reasonably anticipated based on the consumer's
existing relationship with the controller, or are otherwise compatible with
processing data in furtherance of the provisions of a product or service
specifically requested by a consumer or the performance of a contract to which
the consumer is a party.
J. The obligations imposed on controllers or processors pursuant to this
Chapter shall not apply where compliance by the controller or processor with
said Sections would violate an evidentiary privilege pursuant to the laws of this
state. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to prevent a controller or
processor from providing personal data concerning a consumer to a person
covered by an evidentiary privilege pursuant to the laws of the state as part of
Page 23 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
a privileged communication.
K. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to impose any obligation
on a controller or processor that adversely affects the rights or freedoms of any
person, including but not limited to the rights of any person to freedom of
speech or freedom of the press guaranteed in the First Amendment to the
United States Constitution.
L.(1) Personal data processed by a controller pursuant to this Section
may be processed to the extent that such processing is both of the following:
(a) Reasonably necessary and proportionate to the purposes listed in this
Section.
(b) Adequate, relevant, and limited to what is necessary in relation to the
specific purposes listed in this Section.
(2) Personal data collected, used, or retained pursuant to Subsection I of
this Section shall, where applicable, take into account the nature and purpose
or purposes of such collection, use, or retention. Such data shall be subject to
reasonable administrative, technical, and physical measures to protect the
confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of the personal data and to reduce
reasonably foreseeable risks of harm to consumers relating to such collection,
use, or retention of personal data.
M. If a controller processes personal data pursuant to an exemption in
this Section, the controller bears the burden of demonstrating that such
processing qualifies for the exemption and complies with the requirements in
Subsection L of this Section.
N. Processing personal data for the purposes expressly identified in
Subsections G through I of this Section shall not solely make a legal entity a
controller with respect to such processing.
O.(1) The consumer rights pursuant to R.S. 51:1780.3(A)(2)(a) through
(e) and controller duties pursuant to this Section do not apply to pseudonymous
data in cases in which the controller is able to demonstrate any information
necessary to identify the consumer is kept separately and is subject to effective
Page 24 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
technical and organizational controls that prevent the controller from accessing
the information.
(2) A controller that discloses pseudonymous data or deidentified data
shall exercise reasonable oversight to monitor compliance with any contractual
commitments to which the pseudonymous data or deidentified data is subject
and shall take appropriate steps to address any breach of the contractual
commitments.
P.(1) A person or entity described by R.S. 51:1780.2(A)(3) may not
engage in the sale of personal data that is sensitive data without receiving prior
consent from the consumer.
(2) A person who violates this Section is subject to the penalty under R.S.
51:1780.5.
§1780.5. Enforcement
A. The attorney general shall enforce the provisions of this Chapter.
B. The attorney general shall post on his website, information relating
to the responsibilities of a controller and a processor and consumer rights
pursuant to this Chapter.
C. Any violation of the provisions of this Chapter shall constitute an
unfair and deceptive trade practice pursuant to the Unfair Trade Practices and
Consumer Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401 et seq., excluding private rights of
action as provided in R.S. 51:1409 and 1409.1. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, any monies received related to the attorney
general's enforcement of this Chapter shall be used by the attorney general for
consumer protection efforts or to promote consumer protection and education.
D. Beginning January 1, 2027, and ending July 31, 2027, before bringing
an action pursuant to this Section, the attorney general shall notify a person in
writing, not later than the thirtieth calendar day before initiating an
investigation, identifying the specific provisions of this Chapter the attorney
general alleges is being violated. The attorney general shall not initiate an
investigation against the person if the person does all of the following:
Page 25 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 386 ENROLLED
(1) Cures the alleged violation identified by the attorney general within
the thirty-day period.
(2) Provides the attorney general with a written statement that the
person cured the alleged violation.
(3) Submits supportive documentation to the attorney general to show
how the privacy violation was cured.
(4) Changes are made to the internal policy, if necessary, to ensure that
no such further violations occur.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 26 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.